Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1356.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-34 of Title 2, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Any individual entering through gates used for ingress or
egress to a property designated as an easement shall maintain the
position of the gate upon use.
B. 1. Any individual who violates the provisions of subsection
A of this section shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor
punishable by a fine not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00),
by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than ninety (90) days,
or by both such fine and imprisonment.
2. Any individual convicted of a second offense shall, upon
conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not more
than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), by imprisonment in a county
jail for not more than one hundred eighty (180) days, or by both
such fine and imprisonment.

3. Any individual convicted of a third or subsequent offense
shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine not more than One
Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00), by imprisonment in a
county jail for not more than one (1) year, or by both such fine and
imprisonment.
4. Any individual convicted pursuant to the provisions of this
subsection shall also be liable for damages.
C. The Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry
shall promulgate rules necessary to implement the provisions of this
act.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1356 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 21st day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 28th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1356 Page 3